src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON fX ! førehand
 +N+Fem+Sg+Indef: # ;

!LEXICON fD ! i tide
! +N+Fem+Dat: K ;


LEXICON f1-e- ! helg
 +N: Re      ;
     f1morph ;

LEXICON f1 ! myr, krone
 +N: R       ;
     f1morph ;

LEXICON f1morph
       +N+Fem+Sg: 0-a    ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Use/NG: en     ; ! myren !^C^
       +N+Fem+Pl: er-ene ;

LEXICON f1sg ! grisetang
        +N+Fem+Sg: 0-a ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Use/NG: en  ; ! grisetangen !^C^

LEXICON f1b ! skam
        +N+Fem+Sg:mX4 0-a    ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Use/NG:m   en     ; ! skammen !^C^
        +N+Fem+Pl:m   er-ene ;
               +N:    R      ;

LEXICON f1X ! bok
        +N+Fem+Sg:   0-a    ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Use/NG:   en     ; ! boken !^C^
        +N+Fem+Pl:Z1 er-ene ;
               +N:   R      ;

LEXICON f1V ! mus
        +N+Fem+Sg: 0-a   ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Use/NG: en    ; ! musen !^C^
        +N+Fem+Pl: 0-ene ;
               +N: R     ;

LEXICON f2
  f1 ;


LEXICON f3 ! lever
        +N+Fem+Sg:X1 0-a      ; ! lever, levra
 +N+Msc+Sg+Use/NG:   en       ; ! leveren !^C^
        +N+Fem+Pl:X1 e-er-ene ; ! levre/levrer, levrene. Mangler levere
               +N:   R        ;

LEXICON f3b ! søster
 +N+Fem+Sg:   0-a      ; ! søster, søstera
 +N+Msc+Sg:   en       ; ! søsteren !^C^
 +N+Fem+Pl:X1 e-er-ene ;
        +N:   R        ;

LEXICON fGLO
        +N+Fem+Sg:   0-a   ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Use/NG:   en    ; ! gloen !^C^
        +N+Fem+Pl:Z1 r-rne ;
               +N:   R     ;

LEXICON fDATTER
          +N+Fem+Sg+Indef:datter   K ;
 !          +N+Fem+Sg+Def:datra    K ;
            +N+Fem+Sg+Def:dattera  K ;
     +N+Msc+Sg+Def+Use/NG:datteren K ;
!   +N+Fem+Sg+Def+Radical:datra    K ;
          +N+Fem+Pl+Indef:døtre    K ;
   +N+Fem+Pl+Indef+Use/NG:døtrer   K ;
            +N+Fem+Pl+Def:døtrene  K ;
 N+Fem+Sg+Nynorsk+Use/NG+Indef:dotter   K ;
  +N+Fem+Sg+Nynorsk+Use/NG+Def:dottera  K ;
!                      +N:         R ;

!LEXICON fSØSTER
!          +N+Fem+Sg+Indef:søster   K ;
!            +N+Fem+Sg+Def:datra    K ;
!            +N+Msc+Sg+Def:datteren K ;
!!   +N+Fem+Sg+Def+Radical:datra    K ;
!          +N+Fem+Pl+Indef:døtre    K ;
!            +N+Fem+Pl+Def:døtrene  K ;
!  +N+Fem+Sg+Nynorsk+Use/NG+Indef:dotter   K ;
!    +N+Fem+Sg+Nynorsk+Use/NG+Def:dotra    K ;
!!                      +N:         R ;

LEXICON fMOR
            +N+Fem+Sg:mor   0-a   ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Def+Use/NG:moren K     ;
            +N+Fem+Pl:mødr  e-ene ;

LEXICON fROT
            +N+Fem+Sg:rot   0-a   ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Def+Use/NG:roten K     ;
            +N+Fem+Pl:røtt  er-ene ;


LEXICON fGÅS
            +N+Fem+Sg:gås   0-a   ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Def+Use/NG:gåsen K     ;
            +N+Fem+Pl:gjess 0-ene ;

LEXICON fKU
            +N+Fem+Sg:ku   0-a    ;
        +N+Fem+Sg+Def:kua K      ;
 +N+Msc+Sg+Def+Use/NG:kuen K      ;
            +N+Fem+Pl:kyr  0-a    ;
     +N+Fem+Pl+Use/NG:ku   er-ene ;

LEXICON indeclf 
  +N+Fem+Indcl: # ;
!           +N: R ;

! Neuters
! -------

LEXICON nX ! styrbord
 +N+Neu+Sg+Indef: K ;
     +N: R ;

!LEXICON nD ! i live
! +N+Neu+Dat: K ;


!LEXICON n1-e- !
! +N: Re ;

LEXICON n1 ! hus
 +N: R       ;
     n1morph ;

LEXICON n1morph
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et    ;
! +N+Neu+Pl: 0-ene-a ;
 +N+Neu+Pl: 0-ene-a ; ! tribunaler

LEXICON n1b ! rom
 +N+Neu+Sg:mX4 0-et    ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:m   0-ene-a ;
        +N:    R       ;

LEXICON n1c ! søsken, pl. søskena/søsknene
  +N+Neu+Sg:   0-et  ;
  +N+Neu+Pl:   0-a   ;
  +N+Neu+Pl:X1 0-ene ;

LEXICON n1sg ! yr
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et ;
        +N: R    ;

LEXICON n1pl ! odds
 +N+Neu+Pl: 0-ene-a ; ! tribunaler

LEXICON n2 ! eple, salt
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et     ;
 +N+Neu+Pl: er-ene-a ;
        +N: R        ;

LEXICON n2m ! medlem
 +N+Neu+Sg:mX4 0-et       ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:m   0-er-ene-a ;
        +N:    R          ;

LEXICON n2s ! mørke
 +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et ;
        +N: R    ;

LEXICON n3 ! kontor
 +N+Neu+Sg:     0-et       ;   
 +N+Neu+Pl:     0-er-ene-a ;
        +N:     R          ;

LEXICON n3m ! program
 +N+Neu+Sg:mX4 0-et       ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:mX4 0-er-ene-a ;
        +N:    R          ;

LEXICON n3b ! hinder
  +N+Neu+Sg:   0-et      ;
  +N+Neu+Sg:X1 0-et      ;
  +N+Neu+Pl:X1 0-e-ene-a ;

LEXICON n3c ! middel
  +N+Neu+Sg:   0-et       ;
  +N+Neu+Sg:X1 0-et       ;
  +N+Neu+Pl:X1 0-er-ene-a ;

LEXICON n3d ! lager
  +N+Neu+Sg:    0-et      ;
  +N+Neu+Pl:X1  0-e-ene-a ;
         +N:    R         ;

LEXICON n3e ! pulver
  +N+Neu+Sg: 0-et     ;
  +N+Neu+Pl: 0-e-ne-a ;

LEXICON n3f ! beger 
  +N+Neu+Sg:   0-et  ;
  +N+Neu+Pl:   0-ne  ;
  +N+Neu+Pl:X1 e-a   ;

LEXICON n3g ! alter
  +N+Neu+Sg:   0-et    ;
  +N+Neu+Sg:X1 0-et    ;
  +N+Neu+Pl:   0-e-a   ;
  +N+Neu+Pl:X1 e-ene-a ;

LEXICON n3h ! tema
  +N+Neu+Sg:   0-et     ;
  +N+Neu+Pl:   0-er-ene ;

LEXICON n3i ! rabalder
  +N+Neu+Sg:   0-et ;
  +N+Neu+Sg:X1 0-et ;
  +N+Neu+Pl:   K ;
  +N+Neu+Pl:X1 e-ene-a ;

LEXICON n4 ! kriterium
 +N+Neu+Sg:X5 0-et     ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:X5 er-ene-a ;
        +N:   R        ;

LEXICON n4b ! faktum
 +N+Neu+Sg:   0-et   ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:X5 a-aene ;
        +N:   R      ;

LEXICON n4c ! nøytrum
              n4  ;
              n4b ;

LEXICON npldef ! 1980-årene
  +N+Neu+Pl: a-ene ;


LEXICON nFORUM ! forum
 +N+Neu+Sg:um 0-et   ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:   a-aene ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Use/NG:um er-ene ;
        +N:um R      ;

LEXICON nLEKSIKON ! leksikon
 +N+Neu+Sg:on 0-et   ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:   a-aene ;
        +N:on R      ;

LEXICON nMUSEUM
 +N+Neu+Sg:um 0-et     ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:   er-ene-a ;
        +N:um R        ;

LEXICON nØYE
             +N+Neu+Sg:e   0-et     ;
             +N+Neu+Pl:ne  e-ene    ;
+N+Neu+Pl+Indef+Use/NG:er  K        ;
  +N+Neu+Pl+Def+Use/NG:ene K        ;
  +N+Neu+Pl+Def+Use/NG:a   K        ;
                    +N:en  R        ;

LEXICON nKLE ! håndkle, tørkle
       +N+Neu+Sg+Indef:kle    K     ;
         +N+Neu+Sg+Def:kleet  K     ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Def+Err/Orth:kledet K     ;
             +N+Neu+Pl:klæ    r-rne ;

LEXICON nplKLÆR
 +N+Neu+Pl:klær 0-ne  ;

 LEXICON nTRE
 +N+Neu+Sg:e  0-et  ;
 +N+Neu+Pl:æ  r-rne ;

LEXICON nTEMPUS ! tempus:temp TEMPUS ;
                       :us     n1 ;
 +N+Neu+Pl+Indef+Use/NG:ora    K  ;
   +N+Neu+Pl+Def+Use/NG:oraene K  ;
                     +N:us     R  ;

LEXICON fTÅ
     +N+Fem+Sg:tå   0-a  ;
 +N+Msc+Use/NG:tåen # ;
     +N+Fem+Pl:tæ   r-rne ;

! Lexica for definiteness declension
! ==================================

LEXICON a-aene
 +Indef:%>a    K ;
   +Def:%>aene K ;

LEXICON e-ne
 +Indef:%>e  K ;
   +Def:%>ne K ;

LEXICON e-ene
 +Indef:%>e   K ;
   +Def:%>ene K ;

LEXICON e-ene-a
 +Indef:%>e   K ;
   +Def+Use/NG:%>ene K ;
   +Def:%>a   K ;

LEXICON er-ene
 +Indef:%>er  K ;
   +Def:%>ene K ;

LEXICON e-er-ene
 +Indef+Use/NG:%>e   K ;
 +Indef:%>er  K ;
   +Def:%>ene K ;

LEXICON er-ene-a
 +Indef:%>er  K ;
   +Def:%>ene K ;
   +Def+Use/NG:%>a   K ;

LEXICON e-a
 +Indef:%>e  K ;
   +Def+Use/NG:%>a   K ;

LEXICON 0-e-a
 +Indef+Use/NG:  K ;
 +Indef:%>e  K ;
   +Def+Use/NG:%>a   K ;

LEXICON 0-e-ne-a
 +Indef+Use/NG:  K ;
 +Indef:%>e  K ;
   +Def:%>ne K ;
   +Def+Use/NG:%>a   K ;

LEXICON 0-e-ene-a
 +Indef+Use/NG:  K ;
 +Indef:%>e  K ;
   +Def:%>ene K ;
   +Def+Use/NG:%>a   K ;

LEXICON ar-ane	 !! @CODE@ for nynorsk only.
 +Indef:%>ar  K ; !!
   +Def:%>ane K ; !!

LEXICON 0-ane !! @CODE@ for nynorsk only.
 +Indef:      K ;
   +Def:%>ane K ;

LEXICON r-rne  ! trær
 +Indef:%>r   K ;
   +Def:%>rne K ;

LEXICON r-ne  ! gamledager
 +Indef:%>r  K ;
   +Def:%>ne K ;

LEXICON 0-a
        +Indef:    K ;
          +Def:%>a K ;
! +Def+Radical:%>a K ; ! If needed

LEXICON 0-en
 +Indef:     K ;
   +Def:%>en K ;

LEXICON 0-ene
 +Indef:      K ;
   +Def:%>ene K ;

LEXICON 0-er-ene
 +Indef:      K ;
 +Indef:%>er  K ;
   +Def:%>ene K ;

LEXICON 0-er-ene-a
 +Indef:      K ;
 +Indef+Use/NG:%>er  K ;
   +Def+Use/NG:%>ene K ;
   +Def:%>a   K ;

LEXICON 0-ne
 +Indef:     K ;
   +Def:%>ne K ;

LEXICON 0-et
 +Indef:     K ;
   +Def:%>et K ;

LEXICON 0-ene-a
        +Indef:      K ;
          +Def+Use/NG:%>ene K ;
          +Def:%>a   K ;
! +Def+Radical:%>a   K ; ! If needed
