src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON 3_letter
klo+CmpNP/None:klo fGLO ; 
ski+CmpNP/None:ski f1V ; 
LEXICON Noun
helg f1-e- ;
humle f1 ;
pengemarkedsrente f1 ;
tverrelvdaling f1 ;
forsikringsordning f1 ;
halvering f1 ;
smålus f1V ;
sharonfrukt f1 ;
fru indeclf ;
trivselsundersøkelsesskjema n3h ;
debattema n3h ;
turistfirma n3h ;
rike n1 ;
frotterhandkle:frotterhand nKLE ;
håndkle:hånd nKLE ;
forkle:for nKLE ;
lommetørkle:lommetør nKLE ;
smørøye nØYE ;
oppfølgingstiltak n1 ;
6%0-årene:6%0-år npldef ;
182%0-årene:182%0-år npldef ;
186%0-årene:186%0-år npldef ;
192%0-årene:192%0-år npldef ;
2%0%0%0-årene:2%0%0%0-år npldef ;
svakøl n1 ;
kopieringsrom n1b;
femininum n4c ;
regionsentrum n4c ;
nøytrum n4c ;
særvotum n4b ;
synonym n3 ;
søsken n1c ;
dekar n1 ;
blandingskrydder n3e ;
heksaeder n3i ;
rabalder n3i ;
jernlager n3d ;
beger n3f ;
askebeger n3f ;
perlesukker n3e ;
anker n3g ;
rundtømmer n3d ;
manometer n3d ;
fargepulver n3e ;
spatt n1 ;
økosystemperspektiv n3 ;
innskrift f2 ;
helsepersonellov f2 ;
never f3 ;
årenever f3 ;
pdf-skjema n3h;
ryggekamera n3h;
fiskeområde n2 ;
læremateriale n2 ;
skjefte n2 ;
ørneøye nØYE ;
nåløye nØYE ;
kuøye nØYE ;
fasettøye nØYE ;
kobleri n2 ;
samfunnsproblem n3 ;
referat n3 ;
fragment n2 ;
gudsøster f3b ;
sykesøster f3b ;
lillesøster f3b ;
navnesøster f3b ;
helsesøster f3b ;
svigersøster f3b ;
faster f3 ;
seter f3 ;
gimmer f3 ;
older f3 ;
betalingsmiddel n3c ;
eksempel n3c ;
barsel n3c ;
merkevesen n3 ;
banner n3e ;
barneteater n3b ;
fangstmønster n3b ;
americium n4 ;
preludium n4 ;
misjonskollegium n4 ;
søknadskriterium n4 ;
atrium n4 ;
kopphåndkle:kopphånd nKLE ;
lerketre:lerketr nTRE ;
hylletre:hylletr nTRE ;
bogtre:bogtr nTRE ;
sedertre:sedertr nTRE ;
løvtre:løvtr nTRE ;
museum:muse nMUSEUM ;
forvaltningsmuseum:forvaltningsmuse nMUSEUM ;
vitenskapsmuseum:vitenskapsmuse nMUSEUM ;
forum:for nFORUM ;
kvinneforum:kvinnefor nFORUM ;
dialogforum:dialogfor nFORUM ;
mineralforum:mineralfor nFORUM ;
trafikksikkerhetsforum:trafikksikkerhetsfor nFORUM ;
hovedleksikon:hovedleksik nLEKSIKON ;
brukerleksikon:brukerleksik nLEKSIKON ;
tilleggsleksikon:tilleggsleksik nLEKSIKON ;
oppdateringsleksikon:oppdateringsleksik nLEKSIKON ;
onomatopoetikon:onomatopoetik nLEKSIKON ;
ørneklo fGLO ;
saueklo fGLO ;
dreggklo fGLO ;
filklo fGLO ;
guddatter:gud fDATTER ;
pleiedatter:pleie fDATTER ;
stedatter:ste fDATTER ;
fosterdatter:foster fDATTER ;
kongsdatter:kongs fDATTER ;
jordmor:jord fMOR ;
oldemor:olde fMOR ;
pleiemor:pleie fMOR ;
stemor:ste fMOR ;
farmor:far fMOR ;
værmor:vær fMOR ;
sengeklær:senge nplKLÆR ;
herreklær:herre nplKLÆR ;
benklær:ben nplKLÆR ;
beinklær:bein nplKLÆR ;
treningsklær:trenings nplKLÆR ;
tempus:temp nTEMPUS ;
gås: fGÅS ;
canadagås:canada fGÅS ;
sædgås:sæd fGÅS ;
dverggås:dverg fGÅS ;
grågås:grå fGÅS ;
håndrot:hånd fROT ;
trerot:tre fROT ;
ørerot:øre fROT ;
gulrot:gul fROT ;
pepperrot:pepper fROT ;
melkeku:melke fKU ;
hoppski f1V ;
bandsko f1V ;
spissmus f1V ;
siland f1X ;
tremannshånd f1X ;
teleskopstang f1X ;
barnebok f1X ;
fargeleggingsbok f1X ;
blåtann indeclf ;
slagkraft f1X ;
førehand fX ;
overhånd fX ;
forhånd fX ;
orde nX ;
absurdum nX ;
stafo nX ;
bero nX ;
skam f1b ;
undervisningsprogram n3m ;
diadem n1b ;
klasserom n1b ;
forrom n1b ;
bygdesentrum n4c ;
arbeidslivssentrum n4c ;
madapolam n2m ;
EU-program n3m ;
dokumentarprogram n3m ;
overvåkningsprogram n3m ;
mobilitetsprogram n3m ;
kirkemedlem n2m ;
lagrettemedlem n2m ;
utvalgsmedlem n2m ;
komitémedlem n2m ;
opplæringsvirkemiddel n3c ;
under n3g ;
hovedlager n3d ;
alter n3g ;
skattesenter n3b ;
grendesenter n3b ;
venteregister n3b ;
genitalium n4b ;
museumsforum n4b ;
kvantum n4b ;
passivum n4b ;
strukturvirkemiddel n3c ;
pulver n3e ;
nummer+N+Neu+Pl:numre 0-ne ;
magesyke f1sg ;
skolemelk f1sg ;
kulturmelk f1sg ;
skummetmjølk f1sg ;
vindkraft f1sg ;
gikt f1sg ;
torskefiske n1sg ;
kystfiske n1sg ;
havrek n1sg ;
knivstål n1sg ;
silogress n1sg ;
tusmørke n2s ;
fiske n2s ;
heimefiske n2s ;
vårfiske n2s ;
lykkønske n2s ;
skrivestøtte f2 ;
kråketå:kråke fTÅ ;
lilletå:lille fTÅ ;
stortå:stor fTÅ ;
direktestøtte f2 ;
skrivesperre f2 ;
lesebrille f2 ;
odds n1pl ;
bakrom n1b;
kaliber n3d ;
markmus f1V ;
røntgen nX ;
